Illinois, session 104th, HB5016.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 5-4.5-95 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-95)7    Sec. 5-4.5-95. GENERAL RECIDIVISM PROVISIONS.8    (a) HABITUAL CRIMINALS.9        (1) Every person who has been twice convicted in any 10    state or federal court of an offense that contains the 11    same elements as an offense now (the date of the offense 12    committed after the 2 prior convictions) classified in 13    Illinois as a Class X felony, criminal sexual assault, 14    aggravated kidnapping, or first degree murder, and who is 15    thereafter convicted of a Class X felony, criminal sexual 16    assault, or first degree murder, committed after the 2 17    prior convictions, shall be adjudged an habitual criminal.18        (2) The 2 prior convictions need not have been for the 19    same offense.20        (3) Any convictions that result from or are connected 21    with the same transaction, or result from offenses 22    committed at the same time, shall be counted for the 23    purposes of this Section as one conviction.  HB5016- 2 -LRB104 15429 RLC 28584 b1        (4) This Section does not apply unless each of the 2    following requirements are satisfied:3            (A) The third offense was committed after July 3, 4        1980.5            (B) The third offense was committed within 20 6        years of the date that judgment was entered on the 7        first conviction; provided, however, that time spent 8        in custody shall not be counted.9            (C) The third offense was committed after 10        conviction on the second offense.11            (D) The second offense was committed after 12        conviction on the first offense.13            (E) (Blank). The first offense was committed when 14        the person was 21 years of age or older. 15        (5) Anyone who, having attained the age of 18 at the 16    time of the third offense, is adjudged an habitual 17    criminal shall be sentenced to a term of natural life 18    imprisonment.19        (6) A prior conviction shall not be alleged in the 20    indictment, and no evidence or other disclosure of that 21    conviction shall be presented to the court or the jury 22    during the trial of an offense set forth in this Section 23    unless otherwise permitted by the issues properly raised 24    in that trial. After a plea or verdict or finding of guilty 25    and before sentence is imposed, the prosecutor may file 26    with the court a verified written statement signed by the   HB5016- 3 -LRB104 15429 RLC 28584 b1    State's Attorney concerning any former conviction of an 2    offense set forth in this Section rendered against the 3    defendant. The court shall then cause the defendant to be 4    brought before it; shall inform the defendant of the 5    allegations of the statement so filed, and of his or her 6    right to a hearing before the court on the issue of that 7    former conviction and of his or her right to counsel at 8    that hearing; and unless the defendant admits such 9    conviction, shall hear and determine the issue, and shall 10    make a written finding thereon. If a sentence has 11    previously been imposed, the court may vacate that 12    sentence and impose a new sentence in accordance with this 13    Section.14        (7) A duly authenticated copy of the record of any 15    alleged former conviction of an offense set forth in this 16    Section shall be prima facie evidence of that former 17    conviction; and a duly authenticated copy of the record of 18    the defendant's final release or discharge from probation 19    granted, or from sentence and parole supervision (if any) 20    imposed pursuant to that former conviction, shall be prima 21    facie evidence of that release or discharge.22        (8) Any claim that a previous conviction offered by 23    the prosecution is not a former conviction of an offense 24    set forth in this Section because of the existence of any 25    exceptions described in this Section, is waived unless 26    duly raised at the hearing on that conviction, or unless   HB5016- 4 -LRB104 15429 RLC 28584 b1    the prosecution's proof shows the existence of the 2    exceptions described in this Section.3        (9) If the person so convicted shows to the 4    satisfaction of the court before whom that conviction was 5    had that he or she was released from imprisonment, upon 6    either of the sentences upon a pardon granted for the 7    reason that he or she was innocent, that conviction and 8    sentence shall not be considered under this Section. 9    (b) When a defendant, over the age of 21 years, is 10convicted of a Class 1 or Class 2 forcible felony, except for 11an offense listed in subsection (c-1) of this Section, after 12having twice been convicted in any state or federal court of an 13offense that contains the same elements as an offense now (the 14date the Class 1 or Class 2 forcible felony was committed) 15classified in Illinois as a Class 2 or greater Class forcible 16felony, except for an offense listed in subsection (c-1) of 17this Section, and those charges are separately brought and 18tried and arise out of different series of acts, that 19defendant shall be sentenced as a Class X offender. This 20subsection does not apply unless:21        (1) the first forcible felony was committed after 22    February 1, 1978 (the effective date of Public Act 23    80-1099);24        (2) the second forcible felony was committed after 25    conviction on the first; and 26        (3) the third forcible felony was committed after   HB5016- 5 -LRB104 15429 RLC 28584 b1    conviction on the second. ; and2        (4) the first offense was committed when the person 3    was 21 years of age or older.4    (c) (Blank). 5    (c-1) Subsection (b) of this Section does not apply to 6Class 1 or Class 2 felony convictions for a violation of 7Section 16-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 8    A person sentenced as a Class X offender under this 9subsection (b) is not eligible to apply for treatment as a 10condition of probation as provided by Section 40-10 of the 11Substance Use Disorder Act (20 ILCS 301/40-10).12(Source: P.A. 100-3, eff. 1-1-18; 100-759, eff. 1-1-19; 13101-652, eff. 7-1-21.)